Maine, session 132, LD115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Impact fee; megayachts
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection.
B. "Fund" means the Megayacht Fund established in subsection 3.
C. "Megayacht" means a privately owned pleasure vessel owned by an individual or a
corporation and measuring at least 150 feet in overall length. "Megayacht" does not
include a commercial fishing vessel, a commercial cruise vessel with more than 20
passengers not including crew, a commercial scientific research vessel, a marine
salvage or construction equipment vessel, a commercial freight-carrying vessel, a
vessel built before 1950, a vessel made primarily of wood, a military vessel or a vessel
owned by an academic institution.
D. "Slip" means a dock, mooring, finger float, pier or any other marine infrastructure
that allows for vessels to securely stay for a period of longer than 8 hours.
2. Impact fee. If a municipality collects slip fees, the municipality shall require the
owner of a megayacht to pay an impact fee of $10 per foot of length over 150 feet for each
day up to 30 consecutive days that the megayacht is secured to a slip with respect to which
the municipality collects a slip fee. The municipality may retain 10% of all impact fees
collected pursuant to this subsection and shall quarterly transmit the remainder of those
impact fees to the Treasurer of State for deposit in the fund. The department may adopt
rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
3. Megayacht Fund established. The Megayacht Fund is established within the
department to receive the department's portion of impact fees assessed and collected under
subsection 2. The department, in accordance with procedures and criteria established by
the department by rule, shall quarterly disburse the money within the fund as follows:
A. Fifty percent of funds to municipalities to support harbor infrastructure and sea level
rise mitigation infrastructure; and
B. Fifty percent of funds to support public transit infrastructure, including ferries and
land-based public transportation.
Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.